Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,346
Snowmobile operation; accident; requirements.

(1) The operator of a snowmobile involved in a collision, accident, or other casualty occurring on any public land, ice, snow, park, right-of-way, trail, or course shall give his or her name and address and the number of such snowmobile in writing to any injured person and to the owner of any property damaged in such collision, accident, or other casualty.

(2) When a collision, accident, or other casualty involving a snowmobile results in death or injury to a person or damage to property in excess of one hundred dollars, the operator of such snowmobile shall within ten days file with the Director of Motor Vehicles a full report of such collision, accident, or other casualty in such form and detail as the director by regulation may prescribe.

Laws 1971, LB 330, § 23;

Laws 1977, LB 230, § 18;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 60-2023;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 442.